Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 5

Motor Vehicles

6-55-501. Privilege tax on vehicles prohibited.

The licensing as a privilege of the driving of any motor driven vehicle upon the roads, streets or other highways of the state is declared an exclusive state privilege and no tax for such privilege under any guise or shape shall hereafter be assessed, levied or collected by any municipality of the state.

Acts 1937 (3rd Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 3336.4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-727.

Cross-References. Collection of road fee from nonresident prohibited, § 7-51-702.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 4 Tenn. Juris., Automobiles, §§ 23, 26.

6-55-502. Conflicting ordinances invalid — Scope of part — License tax on nonresidents prohibited.

All ordinances, rules or regulations heretofore passed, enacted or promulgated by any incorporated municipality of the state in conflict with § 6-55-501 are declared inoperative and of no effect.

Neither § 6-55-501 nor this section shall prohibit municipalities from maintaining and operating safety lanes, inspection bureaus or stations, or shall abridge their right to require city automobile tags.

No municipality shall require any person who does not reside within the municipality's corporate boundaries to purchase a city automobile tag, or pay any license fee, regulatory fee, inspection fee, safety inspection fee, or any citation or fine for noncompliance with any regulatory, license, or inspection requirement, or tax of whatever nature for the privilege of driving a motor vehicle on the roads, streets or highways of such municipality.

Acts 1937 (3rd Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 2; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 3336.5; Acts 1977, ch. 190, § 1; 1978, ch. 784, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-728.

Cross-References. Collection of municipal motor vehicle fees by county clerk; issuance of wheel tax license or motor vehicle regulatory license, § 7-51-703.

Restrictions on local motor vehicle license fees and taxes on nonresidents, § 7-51-702.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 4 Tenn. Juris., Automobiles, § 26.